rus.lexc
! Nikolay Vorontsov, Russian Nouns, 7 Jan. 2023

!Declensions (Zaliznjak, Polivanova - simplified), for now no adjective-style declension endings, palatalisation is treated according to cyrillic-alphabet (can be other solutions), case selection for animate vs. non-animate nouns is left for syntax:
!
!1m: путь putj
!1f: дверь dverj
!
!2m: завод zavod
!2m-pal: портфель portfelj
!
!2n: окно okno
!2n-pal: море more
!
!2f: рука ruka
!2f-pal: неделя nedelja
!
! Words to add: other sub-types, see Zaliznjak


Multichar_Symbols
	+NomSg +AccSg +GenSg +LocSg +DatSg +InstSg
	+NomPl +AccPl +GenPl +LocPl +DatPl +InstPl
	%^О
	%^Е

LEXICON Root
        Nouns ;
!	Verbs ;

LEXICON Nouns
	пут 1m ;
	двер 1f ;

	завод 2m ;
	ножич^Ек 2m ;
	портфел 2m-pal ;

	ок^Он 2n ;
	мор 2n-pal ;

	рук 2f ;
	недел 2f-pal ;

!more words to align with Latvian grammar
стол 2m ;
брат 2m ;
Влад 2m ;
кам^Ен 2m-pal ;
собак 2f ;
рын^Ок 2m ;
комнат 2f ;
ярм 2n ;
рек 2f ;
ноч 1f ;



LEXICON 1m
+NomSg:^ь			# ;
+AccSg:^ь			# ; 
+GenSg:^и			# ;
+LocSg:^и			# ;
+DatSg:^и			# ;
+InstSg:^ем			# ;

+NomPl:^и			# ;
+AccPl:^и			# ; 
+GenPl:^ей			# ;
+LocPl:^ях			# ;
+DatPl:^ям			# ;
+InstPl:^ями			# ;

LEXICON 1f
+NomSg:^ь			# ;
+AccSg:^ь			# ; 
+GenSg:^и			# ;
+LocSg:^и			# ;
+DatSg:^и			# ;
+InstSg:^ью			# ;

+NomPl:^и			# ;
+AccPl:^и			# ; 
+GenPl:^ей			# ;
+LocPl:^ях			# ;
+DatPl:^ям			# ;
+InstPl:^ями			# ; !alternate form ьми

LEXICON 2m
+NomSg:^0			# ;
+AccSg:^0			# ; 
+GenSg:^а			# ;
+LocSg:^е			# ;
+DatSg:^у			# ;
+InstSg:^ом			# ;

+NomPl:^ы			# ;
+AccPl:^ы			# ; 
+GenPl:^ов			# ;
+LocPl:^ах			# ;
+DatPl:^ам			# ;
+InstPl:^ами			# ; 

LEXICON 2m-pal
+NomSg:^ь			# ;
+AccSg:^ь			# ; 
+GenSg:^я			# ;
+LocSg:^е			# ;
+DatSg:^ю			# ;
+InstSg:^ем			# ;

+NomPl:^и			# ;
+AccPl:^и			# ; 
+GenPl:^ей			# ; !alternate form ев
+LocPl:^ях			# ;
+DatPl:^ям			# ;
+InstPl:^ями			# ; 

LEXICON 2n
+NomSg:^о			# ;
+AccSg:^о			# ; 
+GenSg:^а			# ;
+LocSg:^е			# ;
+DatSg:^у			# ;
+InstSg:^ом			# ;

+NomPl:^а			# ;
+AccPl:^а			# ; 
+GenPl:^0			# ;
+LocPl:^ах			# ;
+DatPl:^ам			# ;
+InstPl:^ами			# ; 

LEXICON 2n-pal
+NomSg:^е			# ;
+AccSg:^е			# ; 
+GenSg:^я			# ;
+LocSg:^е			# ;
+DatSg:^ю			# ;
+InstSg:^ем			# ;

+NomPl:^я			# ;
+AccPl:^я			# ; 
+GenPl:^ей			# ;  !alternate form ь
+LocPl:^ях			# ;
+DatPl:^ям			# ;
+InstPl:^ями			# ;

LEXICON 2f
+NomSg:^а			# ;
+AccSg:^у			# ; 
+GenSg:^ы			# ;
+LocSg:^е			# ;
+DatSg:^е			# ;
+InstSg:^ой			# ; !alternate form ою

+NomPl:^ы			# ;
+AccPl:^ы			# ; 
+GenPl:^0			# ;
+LocPl:^ах			# ;
+DatPl:^ам			# ;
+InstPl:^ами			# ; 

LEXICON 2f-pal
+NomSg:^я			# ;
+AccSg:^ю			# ; 
+GenSg:^и			# ;
+LocSg:^е			# ;
+DatSg:^е			# ;
+InstSg:^ей			# ; !alternate form ею

+NomPl:^и			# ;
+AccPl:^и			# ; 
+GenPl:^ь			# ; !alternate form ей
+LocPl:^ях			# ;
+DatPl:^ям			# ;
+InstPl:^ями			# ; 

END
